Florida, session 2026, HB373.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (23) is added to section 775.15,
Florida Statutes, to read:
775.15 Time limitations; general time limitations;
exceptions.—
(23) If the offense is a violation of s. 39.201, the
applicable period of limitation does not begin to run until a
law enforcement agency or other governmental agency, excluding
any institution where the violation occurs, is made aware of the
violation.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb373-00